West Virginia, session 2025, HB2569.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13. Business and Occupation tax. §11-13-3h. Tax Credit for recycling. (a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax imposed by §11-13-2, the amount determined by the type of business being taxed and by the products recycled by said business, for businesses who choose to engage in recycling as it is defined in §22-15-1 et seq.(b) The Tax Commissioner shall prescribe such regulations as he or she deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section and §11-13-1 et seq.